Arkansas, session 2025, HB1811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 88, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-88-107. Reasonable proof of payment for deductible — Recoverable
depreciation — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Fraudulent insurance act" means the same as defined in §
23-66-501;
(2) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association,
partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity;
(3) "Property insurance policy" means an insurance policy issued
by a property and casualty insurer that provides first-party coverage for
loss or damage to real property; and
(4)(A) "Reasonable proof of payment" means evidence of payment.
*ANS343*
03/17/2025 12:16:41 PM ANS343

HB1811
(B) "Reasonable proof of payment" includes:
(i) A canceled check;
(ii) A money order receipt;
(iii) A credit card statement;
(iv) A copy of an executed installment plan
contract; or
(v) Another financing arrangement that requires full
payment of a deductible over time.
(b)(1) A person insured under a property insurance policy shall pay
any deductible applicable to a first-party claim made under the property
insurance policy.
(2) A person that fails to pay a deductible applicable to a
first-party claim under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is committing a
fraudulent insurance act.
(c) A person that waives a deductible, provides a rebate in lieu of a
deductible, or otherwise does not require a deductible to be paid under a
property insurance policy is committing a fraudulent insurance act.
(d) A property and casualty insurer that issues a property insurance
policy with replacement cost coverage may refuse to pay a claim for withheld
recoverable depreciation or a replacement cost holdback under the property
insurance policy until the insurer receives reasonable proof of payment by
the policyholder of any deductible applicable to the claim filed under the
property insurance policy.
(e) A person that violates this section is subject to the Trade
Practices Act, § 23-66-201 et seq.











03/17/2025 12:16:41 PM ANS343